District of Columbia statutes.
8-1841.04

Insurance requirements.

An individual, business, or entity that utilizes a commercial guard dog shall maintain a general liability insurance policy for bodily injury, personal injury, and property damage of not less than $50,000 to insure against liability resulting from acts of the animal performed while on guard duty.

History

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 404, 55 DCR 9186